WebApplication/Admin/Content/Dictionary/da-DK/da-DK.aff
FLAG num
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, intetkøn, -re i flertal
SFX 131 Y 19
SFX 131 0 j/53,84,10,945 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 m/53,84,10,945 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 n/53,84,10,945 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 b/53,84,10,945 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 c/53,84,10,945 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 d/53,84,10,945 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 f/53,84,10,945 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 s/53,84,10,945 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 z/53,84,10,945 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 k/53,84,10,945 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 g/53,84,10,945 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 h/84,10,53,945 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 l/84,10,53,945 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 p/84,10,53,945 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 q/84,10,53,945 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 r/84,10,53,945 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 x/84,10,53,945 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 t/53,84,10,945 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 131 0 v/53,84,10,945 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
#Substantiv, konsonantfordobling, intetkøn, -e i flertal 
SFX 132 Y 120 
SFX 132 0 bet/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 be/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 bene/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 bets/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 bes/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 benes/944 b	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 cet/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ce/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 cene/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 cets/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ces/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 cenes/944 c	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 det/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 de/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 dene/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 dets/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 des/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 denes/944 d	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fet/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fe/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fene/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fets/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fes/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 fenes/944 f	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 get/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ge/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 gene/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 gets/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ges/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 genes/944 g	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 het/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 he/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 hene/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 hets/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 hes/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 henes/944 h	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 jet/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 je/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 jene/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 jets/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 jes/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 jenes/944 j	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ket/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ke/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 kene/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 kets/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 kes/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 kenes/944 k	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 let/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 le/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 lene/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 lets/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 les/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 lenes/944 l	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 met/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 me/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 mene/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 mets/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 mes/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 menes/944 m	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 net/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ne/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 nene/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 nets/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 nes/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 nenes/944 n	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 pet/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 pe/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 pene/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 pets/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 pes/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 penes/944 p	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qet/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qe/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qene/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qets/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qes/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 qenes/944 q	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ret/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 re/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 rene/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 rets/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 res/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 renes/944 r	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 set/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 se/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 sene/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 sets/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ses/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 senes/944 s	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 tet/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 te/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 tene/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 tets/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 tes/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 tenes/944 t	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 vet/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ve/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 vene/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 vets/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ves/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 venes/944 v	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 wet/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 we/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 wene/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 wets/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 wes/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 wenes/944 w	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xet/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xe/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xene/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xets/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xes/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 xenes/944 x	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 zet/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 ze/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 zene/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 zets/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 zes/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
SFX 132 0 zenes/944 z	+KONSONANT_FORDOBLING
